Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4838.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Local prosecutor support grants $ (16,750,000) Local prosecutor support grants 16,750,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 0 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2024-2025 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $0.00 and total state spending from state sources under part 1 to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Local prosecutor support grants $ (16,750,000) Local prosecutor support grants 16,750,000 TOTAL $ 0 Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. If the state administrative board, acting under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under this article, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY - OPERATIONS Sec. 301. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for local prosecutor support grants, the department of treasury shall award grants to eligible offices of county prosecutors to reduce the average caseload per attorney. An office of a county prosecutor is eligible for a grant if the office meets all of the following requirements: (a) The amount of funding the office receives from the county for the county's 2025 fiscal year is not less than the amount of funding the office received from the county in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (b) The county is 1 of the top 15 counties with the highest violent crime rate per 1,000 residents as determined for each county. The violent crime rate is calculated by first dividing the number described in subparagraph (i) by the number described in subparagraph (ii) and then multiplying the result by 1,000: (i) The total violent crime incidents reported for the county according to the most recent annual crime report prepared by the department of state police that is available as of April 1 of the immediately preceding state fiscal year. (ii) The total population of the county according to the most recent federal decennial census. (c) The office applies for a grant in a form and manner as 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 determined by the department of treasury and includes with its application a proposed budget designating that grant proceeds will be used only to support costs that reduce the average caseload per attorney. (d) The office submits a report that includes, at a minimum, the current number of staff, the average caseload per attorney, and the local funding that supports the office for both the county's 2025 fiscal year and the immediately preceding fiscal year. (2) Subject to subsection (4), the amount of the grant to each office of a county prosecutor under subsection (1) must be the greater of either of the following: (a) The amount received under section 991 of article 5 of 2023 PA 119. (b) An amount equal to the product of $7.50 multiplied by the population of the county in which the office of the county prosecutor is located according to the most recent federal decennial census. (3) If any grant money remains after determining the initial grant award amounts under subsection (2), the remaining money must be returned to the state general fund. (4) If the total amount appropriated for local prosecutor support grants does not support the full grant amounts determined under subsection (2), then the grant amount determined under subsection (2) for each office that meets all of the requirements of subsection (1) shall be reduced on a per capita basis determined by the population of the county in which the office is located according to the most recent federal decennial census. (5) The department shall not use any of the funds appropriated under this section for administration. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 (6) Not later than August 1, the department shall submit a report to the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that includes all of the following: (a) A list of all of the offices of a county prosecutor that received a grant under this section. (b) The information required under subsection (1)(d). (c) The initial amount awarded to each office under subsection (2) before any adjustment under subsection (4). (d) If the initial amount under subsection (2) is reduced under subsection (4), the amount of the reduction under subsection (4) for each office. (e) The total amount awarded to each office of a county prosecutor under this section. (7) As used in this section, "office" means an office of a county prosecutor. REPEALER Sec. 1201. Section 993 of article 5 of 2024 PA 121 is repealed.